Utah statutes.
31A-9-401.   Principal office, registered agent, and corruption in members'
meetings.
Section 31A-5-401 governs the location of the principal office and existence
of a registered agent for fraternals.  Section 31A-5-403 applies to members'
meetings of domestic fraternals.
